Nebraska, session 109, LB242.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 13-518, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
13-518 For purposes of sections 13-518 to 13-522:
(1) Allowable growth means (a) for governmental units other than
community colleges, the percentage increase in taxable valuation in
excess of the base limitation established under section 77-3446, if any,
due to (i) improvements to real property as a result of new construction
and , additions to existing buildings, (ii) any other improvements to
real property which increase the value of such property, (iii) and any
increase in valuation due to annexation of real property by the
governmental unit, (iv) a change in the use of real property, (v) and any
increase in personal property valuation over the prior year, and (vi) the
increase in excess valuation over the redevelopment project valuation
described in section 18-2147 for redevelopment projects within the
governmental unit, provided the accumulated excess valuation which exists
as of July 1, 2025, shall be included in the calculation of the increase
in excess valuation for the governmental unit's first fiscal year
beginning on or after July 1, 2025, and (b) for community colleges, the
percentage increase in excess of the base limitation, if any, in full-
time equivalent students from the second year to the first year preceding
the year for which the budget is being determined;
(2) Capital improvements means (a) acquisition of real property or
(b) acquisition, construction, or extension of any improvements on real
property;
(3) Governing body has the same meaning as in section 13-503, except
that for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, such term shall
not include the governing body of any county, city, or village;
(4) Governmental unit means every political subdivision which has
authority to levy a property tax or authority to request levy authority
under section 77-3443, except that such term shall not include (a)
sanitary and improvement districts which have been in existence for five
-2-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
years or less, (b) school districts, or (c) for fiscal years beginning on
or after July 1, 2025, counties, cities, or villages;
(5) Qualified sinking fund means a fund or funds maintained
separately from the general fund to pay for acquisition or replacement of
tangible personal property with a useful life of five years or more which
is to be undertaken in the future but is to be paid for in part or in
total in advance using periodic payments into the fund. The term includes
sinking funds under subdivision (13) of section 35-508 for firefighting
and rescue equipment or apparatus;
(6) Restricted funds means (a) property tax, excluding any amounts
refunded to taxpayers, (b) payments in lieu of property taxes, (c) local
option sales taxes, (d) motor vehicle taxes, (e) state aid, (f) transfers
of surpluses from any user fee, permit fee, or regulatory fee if the fee
surplus is transferred to fund a service or function not directly related
to the fee and the costs of the activity funded from the fee, (g) any
funds excluded from restricted funds for the prior year because they were
budgeted for capital improvements but which were not spent and are not
expected to be spent for capital improvements, (h) the tax provided in
sections 77-27,223 to 77-27,227 beginning in the second fiscal year in
which the county will receive a full year of receipts, and (i) any excess
tax collections returned to the county under section 77-1776. Funds
received pursuant to the nameplate capacity tax levied under section
77-6203 for the first five years after a renewable energy generation
facility has been commissioned are nonrestricted funds; and
(7) State aid means:
(a) For all governmental units, state aid paid pursuant to sections
60-3,202 and 77-3523 and reimbursement provided pursuant to section
77-1239;
(b) For municipalities, state aid to municipalities paid pursuant to
sections 39-2501 to 39-2520, 60-3,190, and 77-27,139.04 and insurance
premium tax paid to municipalities;
-3-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
(c) For counties, state aid to counties paid pursuant to sections
60-3,184 to 60-3,190, insurance premium tax paid to counties, and
reimbursements to counties from funds appropriated pursuant to section
29-3933;
(d) For community colleges, state aid to community colleges paid
pursuant to the Community College Aid Act;
(e) For educational service units, state aid appropriated under
sections 79-1241.01 and 79-1241.03; and
(f) For local public health departments as defined in section
71-1626, state aid as distributed under section 71-1628.08.
Sec. 2. Section 13-3403, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
13-3403 (1) Except as otherwise provided in the Property Tax Growth
Limitation Act, for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, a
political subdivision's property tax request for any year shall not
exceed its property tax request authority as determined under this
section. The preliminary property tax request authority for each
political subdivision shall be the amount of property taxes levied by the
county board of equalization pursuant to section 77-1601 for such
political subdivision in the prior fiscal year, less the sum of
exceptions utilized in the prior year pursuant to subdivisions (1) to (9)
of section 13-3404.
(2) In addition to the preliminary property tax request authority,
the political subdivision's property tax request authority may be
increased by the product of:
(a) The product of (i) the amount of property taxes levied in the
prior year increased by the political subdivision's growth percentage,
less the sum of exceptions utilized in the prior year pursuant to
subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 13-3404 and (ii) the political
subdivision's growth percentage; and
(b) The product of (i) the amount of property taxes levied in the
-4-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
prior year, less the sum of exceptions utilized in the prior year
pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 13-3404 and (ii) the
greater of zero or the inflation percentage.
Sec. 3. Section 13-3404, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
13-3404 A political subdivision may increase its property tax
request authority over the amount determined under section 13-3403 by:
(1) The amount of property taxes budgeted for approved bonds;
(2) The amount of property taxes needed to respond to an emergency
declared in the preceding year, as certified to the auditor;
(3) The amount of unused property tax request authority determined
in accordance with section 13-3406;
(4) The amount of property taxes budgeted in support of (a) a
service relating to an imminent and significant threat to public safety
that (i) was not previously provided by the political subdivision and
(ii) is the subject of an agreement or a modification of an existing
agreement executed after August 21, 2024, whether provided by one of the
parties to the agreement or by an independent joint entity or joint
public agency or (b) an interlocal agreement relating to public safety;
(5) The increase in property tax request authority approved by the
legal voters as provided in section 13-3405;
(6) The amount of property taxes budgeted for public safety services
as defined in section 13-320; and
(7) The amount of property taxes budgeted for county attorneys and
public defenders; .
(8) The amount of property taxes budgeted for substance abuse
prevention, behavioral health, and opioid use prevention;
(9) The amount of property taxes budgeted for matching state and
federal grants; and
(10) The amount of property taxes needed to replace any revenue
stream collected in the prior year that was eliminated or reduced through
-5-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
legislative action.
Sec. 4. Section 13-3405, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
13-3405 (1) A political subdivision may increase its property tax
request authority over the amount determined under section 13-3403 if
such increase is approved by a majority of legal voters voting on the
issue at an election described in subsection (2) of this section. Such
issue shall be placed on the ballot (a) upon the recommendation of the
governing body of such political subdivision or (b) upon the receipt by
the county clerk or election commissioner of a petition requesting such
issue to be placed on the ballot which is signed by at least five percent
of the legal voters of the political subdivision. The recommendation of
the governing body or the petition of the legal voters shall include the
amount by which the political subdivision would increase its property tax
request authority over and above the amount determined under section
13-3403.
(2) Upon receipt of such recommendation or legal voter petition, the
county clerk or election commissioner shall place such issue on the
ballot at the next regularly scheduled election or a special election
called for such purpose and held on the first Tuesday after the second
Monday in May of an odd-numbered year. The election shall be held
pursuant to the Election Act, and all costs shall be paid by the
political subdivision. The issue may be approved on the same question as
a vote to exceed the levy limits provided in section 77-3444. If a
majority of the votes cast on the issue are in favor of increasing the
political subdivision's property tax request authority, the political
subdivision shall be empowered to do so.
Sec. 5. Section 13-3406, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
13-3406 (1) A political subdivision may choose not to increase its
total property taxes levied by the full amount of the property tax
-6-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
request authority allowed in a particular year. In such cases, the
political subdivision may carry forward to future budget years the amount
of unused property tax request authority, but accumulation of unused
property tax request authority shall not exceed an aggregate of five
percent of the total property tax request authority from the prior year.
(2) A political subdivision may choose to convert its accumulated
amount of unused restricted funds authority existing on June 30, 2025, as
determined in accordance with section 13-521, into unused property tax
request authority. The amount converted may then be used by the political
subdivision as unused property tax request authority for fiscal years
beginning on or after July 1, 2025. The amount converted shall not exceed
five percent of the total property taxes levied for the political
subdivision in calendar year 2024.
Sec. 6. Section 14-109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-109 (1)(a) The city council of a city of the metropolitan class
shall have power to tax for revenue, license, and regulate any person
within the limits of the city by ordinance except as otherwise provided
in this section. Such tax may include both a tax for revenue and license.
The city council may raise revenue by levying and collecting a tax on any
occupation or business within the limits of the city. After March 27,
2014, any occupation tax imposed pursuant to this section shall make a
reasonable classification of businesses, users of space, or kinds of
transactions for purposes of imposing such tax, except that no occupation
tax shall be imposed on any transaction which is subject to tax under
section 53-160, 66-489, 66-489.02, 66-4,140, 66-4,145, 66-4,146, 77-2602,
or 77-4008 or which is exempt from tax under section 77-2704.24. The
occupation tax shall be imposed in the manner provided in section
18-1208, except that section 18-1208 does not apply to an occupation tax
subject to section 86-704. All such taxes shall be uniform in respect to
the class upon which they are imposed. All scientific and literary
-7-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
lectures and entertainments shall be exempt from taxation, as well as
concerts and all other musical entertainments given exclusively by the
citizens of the city. It shall be the duty of the city clerk to deliver
to the city treasurer a copy of the ordinance levying such tax.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, limits of the city does not
include the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of such city.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) of this
subsection, the city council shall also have the power to require any
individual whose primary residence or person who owns a place of business
which is within the limits of the city and that owns and operates a motor
vehicle within such limits to annually register such motor vehicle in
such manner as may be provided and to require such person to pay an
annual motor vehicle fee therefor and to require the payment of such fee
upon the change of ownership of such vehicle. All such fees which may be
provided for under this subsection shall be credited to a separate fund
of the city, thereby created, to be used exclusively for constructing,
repairing, maintaining, or improving streets, roads, alleys, public ways,
or parts of such streets, roads, alleys, or ways or for the amortization
of bonded indebtedness when created for such purposes.
(b) No motor vehicle fee shall be required under this subsection if
(i) a vehicle is used or stored but temporarily in such city for a period
of six months or less in a twelve-month period, (ii) an individual does
not have a primary residence or a person does not own a place of business
within the limits of the city and does not own and operate a motor
vehicle within the limits of the city, or (iii) an individual is a full-
time student attending a postsecondary institution within the limits of
the city and the motor vehicle's situs under the Motor Vehicle
Certificate of Title Act is different from the place at which he or she
is attending such institution.
(c) After December 31, 2012, no motor vehicle fee shall be required
of any individual whose primary residence is within the extraterritorial
-8-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
zoning jurisdiction of such city or any person who owns a place of
business within such jurisdiction.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, limits of the city includes the
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of such city.
(3) For purposes of this section, person includes bodies corporate,
societies, communities, the public generally, individuals, partnerships,
limited liability companies, joint-stock companies, cooperatives, and
associations. Person does not include any federal, state, or local
government or any political subdivision thereof.
Sec. 7. Section 15-202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
15-202 A city of the primary class shall have the power to levy
taxes for general revenue purposes on all property within the corporate
limits of the city taxable according to the laws of Nebraska and to levy
an occupation tax on public service property or corporations in such
amounts as may be proper and necessary, in the judgment of the mayor and
city council, for purposes of revenue. All such taxes shall be uniform
with respect to the class upon which they are imposed. The occupation tax
may be based upon a certain percentage of the gross receipts of such
public service corporation or upon such other basis as may be determined
upon by the mayor and city council. After March 27, 2014, any occupation
tax imposed pursuant to this section shall make a reasonable
classification of businesses, users of space, or kinds of transactions
for purposes of imposing such tax, except that no occupation tax shall be
imposed on any transaction which is subject to tax under section 53-160,
66-489, 66-489.02, 66-4,140, 66-4,145, 66-4,146, 77-2602, or 77-4008 or
which is exempt from tax under section 77-2704.24. The occupation tax
shall be imposed in the manner provided in section 18-1208, except that
section 18-1208 does not apply to an occupation tax subject to section
86-704.
Sec. 8. Section 15-203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-9-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
amended to read:
15-203 A city of the primary class shall have power to raise revenue
by levying and collecting a license or occupation tax on any person,
partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or business within
the limits of the city and regulate the same by ordinance except as
otherwise provided in this section and in section 15-212. After March 27,
2014, any occupation tax imposed pursuant to this section shall make a
reasonable classification of businesses, users of space, or kinds of
transactions for purposes of imposing such tax, except that no occupation
tax shall be imposed on any transaction which is subject to tax under
section 53-160, 66-489, 66-489.02, 66-4,140, 66-4,145, 66-4,146, 77-2602,
or 77-4008 or which is exempt from tax under section 77-2704.24. The
occupation tax shall be imposed in the manner provided in section
18-1208, except that section 18-1208 does not apply to an occupation tax
subject to section 86-704. All such taxes shall be uniform in respect to
the class upon which they are imposed. All scientific and literary
lectures and entertainments shall be exempt from such taxation as well as
concerts and all other musical entertainments given exclusively by the
citizens of the city.
Sec. 9. Section 16-205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
16-205 A city of the first class may raise revenue by levying and
collecting a license or occupation tax on any person, partnership,
limited liability company, corporation, or business within the limits of
the city and may regulate the same by ordinance. After March 27, 2014,
any occupation tax imposed pursuant to this section shall make a
reasonable classification of businesses, users of space, or kinds of
transactions for purposes of imposing such tax, except that no occupation
tax shall be imposed on any transaction which is subject to tax under
section 53-160, 66-489, 66-489.02, 66-4,140, 66-4,145, 66-4,146, 77-2602,
or 77-4008 or which is exempt from tax under section 77-2704.24. The
-10-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
occupation tax shall be imposed in the manner provided in section
18-1208, except that section 18-1208 does not apply to an occupation tax
subject to section 86-704. All such taxes shall be uniform in respect to
the class upon which they are imposed. All scientific and literary
lectures and entertainments shall be exempt from such taxation as well as
concerts and all other musical entertainments given exclusively by the
citizens of the city.
Sec. 10. Section 17-525, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
17-525 Cities of the second class and villages shall have power to
raise revenue by levying and collecting a license tax on any occupation
or business within the limits of the city or village and regulate such
occupation or business by ordinance. After March 27, 2014, any occupation
tax imposed pursuant to this section shall make a reasonable
classification of businesses, users of space, or kinds of transactions
for purposes of imposing such tax, except that no occupation tax shall be
imposed on any transaction which is subject to tax under section 53-160,
66-489, 66-489.02, 66-4,140, 66-4,145, 66-4,146, 77-2602, or 77-4008 or
which is exempt from tax under section 77-2704.24. The occupation tax
shall be imposed in the manner provided in section 18-1208, except that
section 18-1208 does not apply to an occupation tax subject to section
86-704. All such taxes shall be uniform in respect to the classes upon
which they are imposed. All scientific and literary lectures and
entertainments shall be exempt from such taxation, as well as concerts
and other musical entertainments given exclusively by the citizens of the
city or village.
Sec. 11. Section 18-1208, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
18-1208 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, after
July 19, 2012, a municipality may impose a new occupation tax or increase
the rate of an existing occupation tax, which new occupation tax or
-11-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
increased rate of an existing occupation tax is projected to generate
annual occupation tax revenue in excess of the applicable amount listed
in subsection (2) of this section, pursuant to section 14-109, 15-202,
15-203, 16-205, or 17-525 if the question of whether to impose the tax or
increase the rate of an existing occupation tax has been submitted at an
election held within the municipality and in which all registered voters
shall be entitled to vote on the question. The officials of the
municipality shall order the submission of the question by submitting a
certified copy of the resolution proposing the tax or tax rate increase
to the election commissioner or county clerk at least fifty days before
the election. The election shall be conducted in accordance with the
Election Act. If a majority of the votes cast upon the question are in
favor of the new tax or increased rate of an existing occupation tax,
then the governing body of such municipality shall be empowered to impose
the new tax or to impose the increased tax rate. If a majority of those
voting on the question are opposed to the new tax or increased rate, then
the governing body of the municipality shall not impose the new tax or
increased rate but shall maintain any existing occupation tax at its
current rate.
(2) The applicable amount of annual revenue for each new occupation
tax or annual revenue raised by the increased rate for an existing
occupation tax for purposes of subsection (1) of this section is:
(a) For cities of the metropolitan class, six million dollars;
(b) For cities of the primary class, three million dollars;
(c) For cities of the first class, seven hundred thousand dollars;
and
(d) For cities of the second class and villages, three hundred
thousand dollars.
(3) After July 19, 2012, a municipality shall not be required to
submit the following questions to the registered voters:
(a) Whether to change the rate of an occupation tax imposed for a
-12-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
specific project which does not provide for deposit of the tax proceeds
in the municipality's general fund; or
(b) Whether to terminate an occupation tax earlier than the
determinable termination date under the original question submitted to
the registered voters.
This subsection applies to occupation taxes imposed prior to, on, or
after July 19, 2012.
(4) This section shall not apply to (a) an occupation tax subject to
section 86-704 or (b) a municipality imposing an occupation tax within
that portion of a good life district established pursuant to the Good
Life Transformational Projects Act which is located within the corporate
limits of such municipality if the good life district applicant has
approved of the occupation tax. The changes made in this subdivision by
Laws 2024, LB1317, shall not be construed to invalidate an occupation tax
imposed prior to April 24, 2024.
(5) No later than ninety days after the end of the fiscal year, each
municipality that imposes a new occupation tax or increases the rate of
an existing any occupation tax on or after the effective date of this act
as provided under this section shall provide an annual report on the
collection and use of such occupation tax. The report shall be posted on
the municipality's public website or made available for public inspection
at a location designated by the municipality. The report shall include,
but not be limited to:
(1) (a) A list of all such occupation taxes collected by the
municipality;
(2) (b) The amount generated annually by each such occupation tax;
(3) (c) Whether funds generated by each such occupation tax are
deposited in the general fund, cash funds, or other funds of the
municipality;
(4) (d) Whether any such occupation tax is dedicated for a specific
purpose, and if so, the amount dedicated for such purpose; and
-13-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
(5) (e) The scheduled or projected termination date, if any, of each
such occupation tax.
Sec. 12. Section 77-1701, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1701 (1) The county treasurer shall be ex officio county
collector of all taxes levied within the county. The county board shall
designate a county official to mail or otherwise deliver a statement of
the amount of taxes due and a notice that special assessments are due, to
the last-known address of the person, firm, association, or corporation
against whom such taxes or special assessments are assessed or to the
lending institution or other party responsible for paying such taxes or
special assessments. Such statement shall clearly indicate, for each
political subdivision, the levy rate and the amount of property taxes due
to fund any and all public safety services, regardless of whether such
amount is taken as an exception to the political subdivision's property
tax request authority under section 13-3404 as defined in section 13-320,
county attorneys, and public defenders. Such statement shall also clearly
indicate, for each political subdivision, the levy rate and the amount of
taxes due as the result of principal or interest payments on bonds issued
by the political subdivision and shall show such rate and amount separate
from any other levy. When taxes on real property are delinquent for a
prior year, the county treasurer shall indicate this information on the
current year tax statement in bold letters. The information provided
shall inform the taxpayer that delinquent taxes and interest are due for
the prior year or years and shall indicate the specific year or years for
which such taxes and interest remain unpaid. The language shall read
"Back Taxes and Interest Due For", followed by numbers to indicate each
year for which back taxes and interest are due and a statement indicating
that failure to pay the back taxes and interest may result in the loss of
the real property. Failure to receive such statement or notice shall not
relieve the taxpayer from any liability to pay such taxes or special
-14-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
assessments and any interest or penalties accrued thereon. In any county
in which a city of the metropolitan class is located, all statements of
taxes shall also include notice that special assessments for cutting
weeds, removing litter, and demolishing buildings are due.
(2) Notice that special assessments are due shall not be required
for special assessments levied by sanitary and improvement districts
organized under Chapter 31, article 7, except that such notice may be
provided by the county at the discretion of the county board or by the
sanitary and improvement district with the approval of the county board.
(3) A statement of the amount of taxes due and a notice that special
assessments are due shall not be required to be mailed or otherwise
delivered pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if the total amount
of the taxes and special assessments due is less than two dollars.
Failure to receive the statement or notice shall not relieve the taxpayer
from any liability to pay the taxes or special assessments but shall
relieve the taxpayer from any liability for interest or penalties. Taxes
and special assessments of less than two dollars shall be added to the
amount of taxes and special assessments due in subsequent years and shall
not be considered delinquent until the total amount is two dollars or
more.
Sec. 13. Section 77-7305, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-7305 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Act shall apply
to tax year 2024 and each tax year thereafter. For tax year 2024, the
total amount of relief granted under the act shall be seven hundred fifty
million dollars. For tax year 2025, the total amount of relief granted
under the act shall be seven hundred eighty million dollars. For tax year
2026, the total amount of relief granted under the act shall be eight
hundred eight million dollars. For tax year 2027, the total amount of
relief granted under the act shall be eight hundred thirty-eight million
dollars. For tax year 2028, the total amount of relief granted under the
-15-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
act shall be eight hundred seventy million dollars. For tax year 2029,
the total amount of relief granted under the act shall be nine hundred
two million dollars. For tax year 2030 and each tax year thereafter, the
total amount of relief granted under the act shall be the total amount of
relief from the prior year increased by three percent. The relief shall
be in the form of property tax credits which appear on property tax
statements. Property tax credits granted under the act shall be credited
against the amount of property taxes owed to school districts.
(2) To determine the amount of the property tax credit for each
parcel, the county treasurer shall multiply the amount disbursed to the
county under subsection (4) of this section by the ratio of the school
district taxes levied in the current prior year on the parcel to the
school district taxes levied in the current prior year on all real
property in the county. The amount so determined shall be the property
tax credit for that parcel.
(3) If the real property owner qualifies for a homestead exemption
under sections 77-3501 to 77-3529, the owner shall also be qualified for
the property tax credit provided in this section to the extent of any
remaining liability after calculation of the homestead exemption. If the
property tax credit provided in this section results in a property tax
liability on the homestead that is less than zero, the amount of the
credit which cannot be used by the taxpayer shall be returned to the
Property Tax Administrator by July 1 of the year the amount disbursed to
the county was disbursed. The Property Tax Administrator shall
immediately credit any funds returned under this subsection to the School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund. Upon the return of any funds
under this subsection, the county treasurer shall electronically file a
report with the Property Tax Administrator, on a form prescribed by the
Tax Commissioner, indicating the amount of funds distributed to each
school district in the county in the year the funds were returned and the
amount of unused credits returned.
-16-

LB242 LB242
2025 2025
(4) The amount disbursed to each county under this section shall be
equal to the amount available for disbursement under subsection (1) of
this section multiplied by the ratio of the school district taxes levied
in the prior year on all real property in the county to the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on all real property in the
state. By September 15, 2024, and by September 15 of each year
thereafter, the Property Tax Administrator shall determine the amount to
be disbursed under this subsection to each county and shall certify such
amounts to the State Treasurer and to each county. The disbursements to
the counties shall occur in two equal payments, the first on or before
January 31 and the second on or before April 1.
(5) After retaining one percent of the amount The county treasurer
shall disburse amounts received under subsection (4) of this section for
costs, the county treasurer shall disburse the remaining funds, which are
credited against the amount of property taxes owed to school districts,
in the same manner as if such funds had been received in the form of
property tax payments for property taxes owed to school districts,
meaning any amounts attributable to divided taxes pursuant to section
18-2147 of the Community Development Law shall be remitted to the
applicable authority for which such taxes were divided.
(6) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund shall be
used for purposes of making the disbursements to counties required under
subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 14. Original sections 14-109, 15-202, 15-203, 16-205, and
17-525, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 13-518,
13-3403, 13-3404, 13-3405, 13-3406, 18-1208, 77-1701, and 77-7305,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 15. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-17-